South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3515.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-5-320(D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D)(1) A change of address form submitted in accordance with state law for purposes of a state motor vehicle driver's license serves as notification of change of address for voter registration unless the qualified elector states on the form that the change of address is not for voter registration purposes. (2) The provisions of this section apply to all change of address forms submitted using any method authorized by the Department of Motor Vehicles including, without limitation, forms submitted by mail, in person, or electronically. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall transmit a copy of the qualified elector's signature submitted on the change of address form, or an electronic copy of the qualified elector's signature from his driver's license or state identification card, as appropriate, along with the change of address information to the State Election Commission or county board of voter registration and elections, as appropriate. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----